Washington statutes.
RCW 42.30.220

Recording or online streaming by agency encouraged.

(1) Public agencies are encouraged to make an audio or video recording of, or to provide an online streaming option for, all regular meetings of its governing body, and to make recordings of these meetings available online for a minimum of six months.

(2) This section does not alter a local government's recordkeeping requirements under chapter 42.56 RCW.

[ 2022 c 115 s 4.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—2022 c 115: See note following RCW 42.30.230.